Georgia, session 2025_26, HB903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 13 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding administrative procedure, is amended by revising paragraph (1)
of Code Section 50-13-2, relating to definitions, as follows:
"(1) 'Agency' means, unless otherwise required by federal law, each state board, bureau,
commission, department, activity, or officer of the executive branch of state government
authorized by law expressly to make rules and regulations or to determine contested
cases, except. Such term shall specifically not include the General Assembly; or the
judiciary; the Governor; the State Board of Pardons and Paroles; the State Financing and
Investment Commission; the State Properties Commission; the Board of Bar Examiners;
H. B. 903
- 1 -

LC 28 0697
the Board of Corrections and its penal institutions; the State Board of Workers'
Compensation;. Such term shall include all public authorities except as otherwise
expressly provided by law; the State Personnel Board; the Department of Administrative
Services or commissioner of administrative services; the Board of Regents of the
University System of Georgia; the Technical College System of Georgia; the Nonpublic
Postsecondary Education Commission; the Department of Labor when conducting
hearings related to unemployment benefits or overpayments of unemployment benefits;
the Department of Revenue when conducting hearings relating to alcoholic beverages,
tobacco, or bona fide coin operated amusement machines or any violations relating
thereto; the Georgia Higher Education Savings Plan; the Georgia ABLE Program
Corporation; any school, college, hospital, or other such educational, eleemosynary, or
charitable institution; or any agency when its action is concerned with the military or
naval affairs of this state. Such term shall also include the State Board of Education and
Department of Education, subject to the following qualifications:
(A) Subject to the limitations of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, all otherwise valid
rules adopted by the State Board of Education and Department of Education prior to
January 1, 1990, are ratified and validated and shall be effective until January 1, 1991,
whether or not such rules were adopted in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter; and
(B) Effective January 1, 1991, any rule of the State Board of Education or Department
of Education which has not been proposed, submitted, and adopted in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter shall be void and of no effect."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 903
- 2 -